Massachusetts, session 194th, H2409.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following sections:-
Section 142P. Whereas construction materials are frequently treated with toxic
preservatives, including but not limited to, copper chromium arsenate, creosote, or
pentachlorophenol, and the burning of construction and demolition waste as biofuel needlessly
risks the release of such toxic substances into the environment and communities, the burning of
construction and demolition waste as a source of biofuel in energy generating facilities shall be
prohibited. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, no
energy-generating facility, as defined by Section 69G of Chapter 164, shall be permitted to burn
of 2

any manner of construction or demolition waste or any manner of material intended for use
principally in construction as fuel.
Section 142Q. By no later than 60 days after the effective date of this Act, the Secretary
of Energy and Environmental Affairs shall amend any regulations or policies regarding the
permitting or operation of energy-generating facilities to be in conformity with this Act. The
Secretary may temporarily suspend or modify any permitting proceeding to be in conformity
with this Act. The Secretary may deem such amendments, suspensions, or modifications to be
emergency regulations or measures in the interest in immediate public health.
of 2